North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-13.1 Turkey Promotion Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-13.1-01.
Title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-03.
Assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-04.
Assessment collected and remitted by processor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-05.
Special fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-06.
Processor to give invoice to producer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-07.
Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-08.
Commissioner to effectuate purposes of this chapter — Advice of federation sought. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-09.
Out-of-state processors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-10.
Turkey information in report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-11.
Collection of unpaid assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-12.
Delinquent assessment remittances. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-13.1-13.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.